de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrradzubehör > Fahrradwerkzeug: Fahrrad-Innenlagerwerkzeuge; Fahrrad-Entlüftungskits; Fahrrad-Kassetten- & Freilaufwerkzeuge; Fahrradkettenwerkzeuge; Fahrrad-Schmiermittel & -Reiniger; Fahrrad-Multitools; Fahrrad-Pedalschlüssel; Fahrrad-Speichenschlüssel; Laufradbau-Werkzeuge; Kettenpeitschen
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Pyöräilytarvikkeet > Polkupyörätyökalut: Polkupyörän keskiötyökalut; Polkupyörän jarrujen ilmauspakkaukset; Polkupyörän pakka- ja vapaaratastyökalut; Polkupyörän ketjujen työkalut; Polkupyörän voitelu- ja puhdistusaineet; Monityökalut polkupyörille; Polkupyörän poljinavaimet; Polkupyörän pinna-avaimet; Polkupyörän kiekkojen rakennustyökalut; Ketjuruoskat
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycle Accessories > Bicycle Tools: Bicycle Bottom Bracket Tools; Bicycle Brake Bleed Kits; Bicycle Cassette & Freewheel Tools; Bicycle Chain Tools; Bicycle Lubricants & Cleaners; Bicycle Multi-Tools; Bicycle Pedal Wrenches; Bicycle Spoke Wrenches; Bicycle Wheel Building Tools; Chain Whips
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Аксесоари за велосипеди > Инструменти за велосипеди: Инструменти за долна скоба на велосипед; Комплект обезвъздушаване на велосипедни спирачки; Инструменти за велосипедни касети и задни венци; Инструменти за вериги за велосипеди; Смазки и почистващи препарати за велосипеди; Многофункционални инструменти за велосипеди; Ключове за педали за велосипед; Ключове за спици за велосипеди; Инструменти за изработка на велосипедни колела; Камшици за верига
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračių priedai > Dviračių įrankiai: Dviračių vidinės ašies įrankiai; Dviračių stabdžių nuorinimo rinkiniai; Dviračių kasetės ir laisvosios žvaigždutės įrankiai; Dviračių grandinės įrankiai; Dviračių tepalai ir valikliai; Dviračių daugiafunkciai įrankiai; Dviračių pedalų raktai; Dviračių stipinų rakteliai; Dviračių ratų surinkimo įrankiai; Grandinių laikikliai
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Αξεσουάρ ποδηλάτου > Εργαλεία ποδηλάτου: Εργαλεία μεσαίας τριβής ποδηλάτου; Κιτ εξαέρωσης φρένων ποδηλάτου; Εργαλεία κασέτας και ελεύθερου ποδηλάτου; Εργαλεία αλυσίδας ποδηλάτου; Λιπαντικά και καθαριστικά ποδηλάτου; Πολυεργαλεία ποδηλάτου; Κλειδιά για πεντάλ ποδηλάτου; Κλειδιά για ακτίνες ποδηλάτου; Εργαλεία κατασκευής τροχών ποδηλάτου; Μαστίγια αλυσίδας
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Pribor za bicikle > Alati za bicikle: Alati za donju osovinu bicikla; Kompleti za odzračivanje kočnica za bicikl; Alati za kazetu i zupčanik za bicikl; Alati za lanac bicikla; Maziva i sredstva za čišćenje za bicikl; Višenamjenski alati za bicikle; Ključevi za pedale za bicikl; Ključevi za žbice za bicikl; Alat za izradu kotača bicikla; Lančani bičevi
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykeltilbehør > Cykelværktøjer: Krankboks-værktøj til cykler; Udluftningssæt til cykelbremser; Kassette- og friløbsværktøj til cykler; Cykelkædeværktøj; Smøremidler og renseprodukter til cykler; Cykelmultiværktøj; Pedalnøgler til cykler; Egernøgler til cykler; Værktøj til bygning af cykelhjul; Kædepiske
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车配件 > 自行车工具: 自行车中轴工具; 自行车刹车注油套件; 自行车卡式与旋式飞轮工具; 自行车链条工具; 自行车润滑剂与清洁剂; 自行车多功能工具; 自行车脚踏扳手; 自行车辐条扳手; 自行车车轮组装工具; 链条扳手
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Linh kiện xe đạp > Dụng cụ xe đạp: Dụng cụ tháo trục giữa xe đạp; Bộ xả e phanh xe đạp; Dụng cụ tháo líp xe đạp; Dụng cụ xích xe đạp; Dầu bôi trơn và chất tẩy rửa xe đạp; Dụng cụ đa năng dành cho xe đạp; Cờ lê tháo bàn đạp xe đạp; Cờ lê chỉnh nan hoa xe đạp; Dụng cụ cân vành xe đạp; Cờ lê xích
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Akcesoria do rowerów > Narzędzia do rowerów: Klucze do suportu rowerowego; Zestawy do odpowietrzania hamulców rowerowych; Klucze do kaset i wolnobiegów; Narzędzia do łańcucha rowerowego; Smary i środki czyszczące do rowerów; Rowerowe narzędzia wielofunkcyjne; Klucze do pedałów rowerowych; Klucze do szprych rowerowych; Narzędzia do centrowania i zaplatania kół rowerowych; Baciki do kaset
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Accesorios para bicicletas > Herramientas para bicicletas: Herramientas de pedalier para bicicleta; Kits de purga de frenos para bicicleta; Herramientas de casete y rueda libre para bicicleta; Herramientas para cadenas de bicicletas; Lubricantes y limpiadores para bicicleta; Multiherramientas para bicicletas; Llaves de pedal para bicicleta; Llaves de radios para bicicleta; Herramientas para armar ruedas de bicicletas; Llaves de cadena
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Acessórios para bicicletas > Ferramentas para bicicletas: Ferramentas para movimento central de bicicleta; Kits de sangria de freio para bicicleta; Ferramentas para cassete e catraca de bicicleta; Ferramentas para corrente de bicicleta; Lubrificantes e limpadores para bicicleta; Multiferramentas para bicicleta; Chaves de pedal para bicicleta; Chaves de raio para bicicleta; Ferramentas para montagem de rodas de bicicleta; Chaves chicote
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsaccessoires > Fietsgereedschap: Trapasgereedschap voor fietsen; Ontluchtingssets voor fietsremmen; Cassette- en freewheel-gereedschap voor fietsen; Fietskettinggereedschap; Smeermiddelen en reinigers voor fietsen; Fietsmultigereedschap; Pedaalsleutels voor fietsen; Spaaksleutels voor fietsen; Gereedschap voor het bouwen van fietswielen; Kettingzwepen
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車配件 > 自行車工具: 自行車 BB 中軸工具; 自行車煞車換油套件; 自行車飛輪工具; 自行車鏈條工具; 自行車潤滑油與清潔劑; 自行車多功能工具; 自行車踏板扳手; 自行車輻條扳手; 自行車編輪工具; 飛輪扳手
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Accessori per biciclette > Strumenti per bicicletta: Estrattori per movimento centrale della bicicletta; Kit di spurgo per freni da bicicletta; Estrattori per cassetta e ruota libera da bicicletta; Utensili per catene per bicicletta; Lubrificanti e detergenti per bicicletta; Multiutensili per bicicletta; Chiavi per pedali da bicicletta; Tiraraggi per bicicletta; Strumenti per assemblaggio ruote di bicicletta; Chiavi a frusta
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Acessórios para bicicleta > Ferramentas para bicicleta: Ferramentas para eixo pedaleiro de bicicleta; Kits de sangramento de travões de bicicleta; Ferramentas de cassete e roda livre de bicicleta; Ferramentas de corrente para bicicleta; Lubrificantes e produtos de limpeza para bicicleta; Multiferramentas para bicicleta; Chaves de pedais de bicicleta; Chaves de raios para bicicleta; Ferramentas de montagem de rodas de bicicleta; Chaves de corrente
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > อุปกรณ์จักรยาน > เครื่องมือจักรยาน: เครื่องมือถอดกะโหลกจักรยาน; ชุดเครื่องมือไล่น้ำมันเบรกจักรยาน; เครื่องมือถอดเฟืองสวมและเฟืองเกลียวจักรยาน; เครื่องมือเกี่ยวกับโซ่จักรยาน; น้ำมันหล่อลื่นและน้ำยาทำความสะอาดจักรยาน; เครื่องมือจักรยานแบบอเนกประสงค์; ประแจขันบันไดจักรยาน; ประแจขันซี่ลวดจักรยาน; เครื่องมือประกอบล้อจักรยาน; ประแจโซ่
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Jízdní kola – příslušenství > Cyklistické nářadí: Stahováky středových složení na kolo; Odvzdušňovací sady na brzdy kola; Stahováky kazet a vícekoleček na kolo; Nářadí pro servis řetězu; Maziva a čističe na kolo; Multifunkční nářadí pro cyklisty; Klíče na pedály kola; Centrovací klíče na kolo; Nástroje na vyplétání jízdních kol; Biče na kazety
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykkeltilbehør > Sykkelverktøy: Kranklagerverktøy til sykkel; Luftesett til sykkelbremser; Kassett- og frikransverktøy til sykkel; Kjedeverktøy for sykkel; Smøremidler og rengjøringsmidler til sykkel; Multiverktøy for sykkel; Pedalnøkler til sykkel; Eikenøkler til sykkel; Hjulbyggingsverktøy for sykkel; Kjedepisker
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Аксессуары для велосипедов > Инструменты для велосипедов: Инструменты для каретки велосипеда; Наборы для прокачки велосипедных тормозов; Инструменты для снятия кассет и трещоток велосипеда; Выжимки цепей для велосипедов; Смазки и очистители для велосипедов; Мультитулы для велосипедов; Педальные ключи для велосипеда; Спицевые ключи для велосипеда; Инструменты для сборки велосипедных колес; Цепные хлысты
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cykeltillbehör > Cykelverktyg: Vevlagerverktyg för cykel; Luftningskit för cykelbromsar; Kassett- och frihjulverktyg för cykel; Cykelkedjeverktyg; Smörjmedel och rengöring för cykel; Multiverktyg för cykel; Pedalnycklar för cykel; Ekernycklar för cykel; Verktyg för hjulbyggnad; Kedjepiskor
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Accesorii pentru biciclete > Unelte pentru biciclete: Unelte pentru butuc de pedalier; Kituri de purjare a frânelor de bicicletă; Unelte pentru casetă și roată liberă de bicicletă; Unelte pentru lanțuri de biciclete; Lubrifianți și produse de curățare pentru bicicletă; Unelte multifuncționale pentru biciclete; Chei pentru pedale de bicicletă; Chei pentru spițe de bicicletă; Scule pentru spițat și centrat roți de bicicletă; Chei cu lanț pentru pinioane
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Dodatki za kolesa > Orodje za kolesa: Orodja za spodnji nosilec kolesa; Komplet za odzračevanje zavor za kolesa; Orodja za kolesarske verižnike in verižnike s prostim tekom; Orodje za verige za kolo; Maziva in čistila za kolesa; Večnamenska orodja za kolesa; Ključi za kolesarska pedala; Ključi za špice koles; Orodja za izdelavo koles; Verige
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisiklet Aksesuarları > Bisiklet Araçları: Bisiklet orta göbek aletleri; Bisiklet fren hava alma kitleri; Bisiklet kaset ve ruble aletleri; Bisiklet Zinciri Araçları; Bisiklet yağlayıcıları ve temizleyicileri; Bisiklet Çok Amaçlı Aletler; Bisiklet pedal anahtarları; Bisiklet akort anahtarları; Bisiklet jant örme aletleri; Zincir kamçıları
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 부대용품 > 자전거 공구: 자전거 바텀 브래킷 도구; 자전거 브레이크 블리드 키트; 자전거 카세트 및 프리휠 도구; 자전거 체인 공구; 자전거 윤활유 및 세척제; 자전거 다용도 공구; 자전거 페달 렌치; 자전거 스포크 렌치; 자전거 휠 빌딩 공구; 체인 휩
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車関連用品 > 自転車用工具: 自転車用ボトムブラケットツール; 自転車用ブレーキブリードキット; 自転車用スプロケット・ボスフリーツール; 自転車用チェーン工具; 自転車用潤滑油・クリーナー; 自転車用マルチツール; 自転車用ペダルレンチ; 自転車用スポークレンチ; 自転車用ホイール組みツール; チェーンウィップ
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Accessoires de cyclisme > Outils pour vélos: Outils pour boîtier de pédalier de vélo; Kits de purge de freins de vélo; Outils pour cassette et roue libre de vélo; Outils pour chaîne de vélo; Lubrifiants et nettoyants pour vélo; Outils multifonctions pour vélo; Clés à pédale de vélo; Clés à rayons de vélo; Outils de montage de roues de vélos; Fouets à chaîne
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Príslušenstvo pre bicykle > Cyklonáradie: Náradie na stredové zloženie bicykla; Súprava na odvzdušnenie bŕzd bicykla; Nástroje na kazety a voľnobeh bicyklov; Náradie na reťaze bicyklov; Mazivá a čističe na bicykle; Viacúčelové náradie na bicykel; Kľúče na pedále bicyklov; Kľúče na špice bicyklov; Náradie na výrobu bicyklových kolies; Reťazové biče
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpár-kiegészítők > Kerékpárszerszámok: Kerékpár középcsapágy-szerszámok; Kerékpárfék-légtelenítő készletek; Kerékpár fogaskoszorú- és racsniszerelő szerszámok; Kerékpárlánceszközök; Kerékpár-kenőanyagok és -tisztítók; Kerékpáros többfunkciós szerszámok; Pedálkulcsok; Küllőkulcsok; Kerékpárkerék-építő szerszámok; Láncostorok